Mississippi, session 2026, SB3073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, for the support of said board for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... ............................................ $ 188,645.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Chiropractic Examiners Board shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2026.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 3.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 5.  Of the funds appropriated under this act, funds are provided for any ITS charges that may be required for system upgrades or migration related to the Cloud Center of Excellence Act, as described in Section 25-53-251. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) is provided for the purpose of replacing and upgrading the licensing management system. SECTION 7.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.